Florida, session 2026, SB316.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSection 908.14, Florida Statutes, is created to 31 read: 32 908.14âVisible Identification Standards for Immigration 33 Based Law Enforcement Act.â 34 (1)âThis section may be cited as the âVISIBLE Act.â 35 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 36 (a)ââCovered immigration officerâ means a person who is 37 authorized to perform immigration enforcement functions and who 38 is: 39 1.âAn officer or employee of a law enforcement agency; 40 2.âAn officer or employee of United States Customs and 41 Border Protection; 42 3.âAn officer or employee of United States Immigration and 43 Customs Enforcement; or 44 4.âA person authorized, deputized, or designated under 45 federal law, regulation, or agreement to perform immigration 46 enforcement functions. 47 (b)ââPublic immigration enforcement functionâ means any 48 activity that involves the direct exercise of federal 49 immigration authority through public-facing actions, including a 50 patrol, a stop, an arrest, a search, an interview to determine 51 immigration status, a raid, a checkpoint inspection, or the 52 service of a judicial or administrative warrant. The term does 53 not include covert, nonpublic operations or nonenforcement 54 activities. 55 (c)ââVisible identificationâ means the display of the name 56 or widely recognized initials of the employing agency of a 57 covered immigration officer and such officerâs last name or 58 badge or identification number, in a size and format that 59 complies with the requirements in subsection (4). 60 (3)âA covered immigration officer who directly engages in a 61 public immigration enforcement function within this state must 62 wear visible identification at all times during such engagement. 63 (4)âThe visible identification must: 64 (a)âFor the name of the employing agency of the covered 65 immigration officer, be displayed in a size and format that is 66 clearly legible from a distance of not less than 25 feet, using 67 materials or markings suitable for visibility in both daylight 68 and low-light conditions under normal operational conditions. 69 (b)âFor the covered immigration officerâs last name or 70 badge or identification number, be displayed in a manner that is 71 clearly visible and readable during direct engagement with the 72 public. 73 (c)âBe displayed on the covered immigration officerâs 74 outermost garment or gear and may not be obscured by tactical 75 equipment, body armor, or accessories. 76 (5)âA covered immigration officer may not wear nonmedical 77 face coverings, including masks or balaclavas, which impair the 78 visibility of the identifying information required under this 79 section or obscure the officerâs face unless such face covering 80 is necessary to protect the integrity of a covert, nonpublic 81 operation or to guard against hazardous environmental 82 conditions. 83 (6)âThe State Board of Immigration Enforcement shall do all 84 of the following: 85 (a)âReceive and investigate complaints from the public 86 concerning violations of this section. 87 (b)âEnsure that a covered immigration officer who fails to 88 comply with the requirements of this section receives 89 appropriate disciplinary action, including a written reprimand, 90 suspension, or other personnel action, consistent with the 91 policies of the officerâs employing agency and any applicable 92 collective bargaining agreement. 93 (c)âMake recommendations to the Legislature concerning 94 compliance with this section and corrective actions that should 95 be taken. 96 (d)âCarry out its responsibilities under this section in 97 accordance with its statutory authority. 98 (7)âBy June 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the State 99 Immigration Enforcement Council shall submit a report to the 100 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 101 Representatives which includes all of the following information: 102 (a)âThe total number of public immigration enforcement 103 functions conducted during the reporting period. 104 (b)âThe number of documented instances of noncompliance 105 with this section. 106 (c)âA summary of disciplinary or remedial actions taken 107 against any covered immigration officer who did not comply with 108 this section. 109 Section 2.âParagraph (h) is added to subsection (3) of 110 section 908.1031, Florida Statutes, to read: 111 908.1031âState Board of Immigration Enforcement; creation; 112 purpose and duties.â 113 (3)âThe board is the chief immigration enforcement officer 114 of the state and shall: 115 (h)âInvestigate any complaint received for violations of 116 and otherwise enforce the Visible Identification Standards for 117 Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act pursuant to s. 908.14. 118 Section 3.âParagraph (i) is added to subsection (4) of 119 section 908.1032, Florida Statutes, to read: 120 908.1032âState Immigration Enforcement Council.âThe State 121 Immigration Enforcement Council, an advisory council as defined 122 in s. 20.03, is created within the State Board of Immigration 123 Enforcement for the purpose of advising the board. 124 (4)âThe council shall: 125 (i)âCollect data relating to the Visible Identification 126 Standards for Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act and, by June 127 30 of each year, submit a report to the President of the Senate 128 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance 129 with s. 908.14. 130 Section 4.âSection 943.1718, Florida Statutes, is amended 131 to read: 132 943.1718âBody cameras and face coverings; policies and 133 procedures; penalties.â 134 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 135 (a)ââBody cameraâ means a portable electronic recording 136 device that is worn on a law enforcement officerâs person which 137 that records audio and video data of the officerâs law 138 enforcement-related encounters and activities. 139 (b)1.ââFace coveringâ means any opaque mask, garment, 140 helmet, or other item, including, but not limited to, a 141 balaclava, tactical mask, gator, ski mask, or any other similar 142 type of facial covering or face-shielding item, which conceals 143 or obscures the face of a person. 144 2.âThe term does not include any of the following: 145 a.âA translucent face shield or clear mask that does not 146 conceal the wearerâs face. 147 b.âA medical mask or surgical mask used to protect against 148 the transmission of disease or infection. 149 c.âAny other mask or device, including, but not limited to, 150 air-purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained 151 breathing apparatuses necessary to protect against exposure to a 152 toxin, gas, smoke, or any other hazardous environmental 153 condition. 154 (c)(b)ââLaw enforcement agencyâ means an agency that has a 155 primary mission of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing 156 the penal, criminal, traffic, and motor vehicle laws of the 157 state and in furtherance of that primary mission employs law 158 enforcement officers as defined in s. 943.10. 159 (d)(c)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as 160 provided in s. 943.10. 161 (e)ââUndercover investigationâ means a planned act 162 authorized by a law enforcement agency or a court order which 163 intentionally uses an undercover operative to interact with a 164 suspect or others or to obtain evidence of criminal activity. 165 (f)ââUndercover operativeâ means a law enforcement officer 166 or a full-time sworn officer in this state or another state or 167 of the Federal Government using an assumed name or cover 168 identity to interact with persons or entities to collect 169 evidence of criminal activity. 170 (2)âBODY CAMERAS.â 171 (a)âA law enforcement agency that permits its law 172 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall establish 173 policies and procedures addressing the proper use, maintenance, 174 and storage of body cameras and the data recorded by body 175 cameras. The policies and procedures must include: 176 1.(a)âGeneral guidelines for the proper use, maintenance, 177 and storage of body cameras. 178 2.(b)âAny limitations on which law enforcement officers are 179 permitted to wear body cameras. 180 3.(c)âAny limitations on law-enforcement-related encounters 181 and activities in which law enforcement officers are permitted 182 to wear body cameras. 183 4.(d)âA provision permitting a law enforcement officer 184 using a body camera to review the recorded footage from the body 185 camera, upon his or her own initiative or request, before 186 writing a report or providing a statement regarding any event 187 arising within the scope of his or her official duties. Any such 188 provision may not apply to an officerâs inherent duty to 189 immediately disclose information necessary to secure an active 190 crime scene or to identify suspects or witnesses. 191 5.(e)âGeneral guidelines for the proper storage, retention, 192 and release of audio and video data recorded by body cameras. 193 (b)(3)âA law enforcement agency that permits its law 194 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall: 195 1.(a)âEnsure that all personnel who wear, use, maintain, or 196 store body cameras are trained in the law enforcement agencyâs 197 policies and procedures concerning them. 198 2.(b)âEnsure that all personnel who use, maintain, store, 199 or release audio or video data recorded by body cameras are 200 trained in the law enforcement agencyâs policies and procedures. 201 3.(c)âRetain audio and video data recorded by body cameras 202 in accordance with the requirements of s. 119.021, except as 203 otherwise provided by law. 204 4.(d)âPerform a periodic review of actual agency body 205 camera practices to ensure conformity with the agencyâs policies 206 and procedures. 207 (c)(4)âChapter 934 does not apply to body camera recordings 208 made by law enforcement agencies that elect to use body cameras. 209 (3)âFACE COVERINGS.â 210 (a)âA law enforcement officer may not wear a face covering 211 in the performance of his or her official duties. 212 (b)âBefore undertaking an undercover investigation that is 213 reasonably likely to involve a law enforcement officer wearing a 214 face covering in the performance of his or her official duties, 215 a law enforcement agency must provide advance notice to the 216 sheriff with jurisdiction over the location in which the 217 undercover investigation will take place. Such notice must be 218 given at least 12 hours before the undercover investigation 219 begins and must include when and where the law enforcement 220 officer will be operating, his or her planned actions, and the 221 approximate time and duration of the undercover investigation. 222 (c)âParagraph (a) does not apply to: 223 1.âA law enforcement officer performing his or her duties 224 as an undercover operative during an active undercover 225 investigation; 226 2.âProtective gear used by a Special Weapons and Tactics 227 (SWAT) team officer which is necessary to protect his or her 228 face from harm while performing SWAT team duties and 229 responsibilities; or 230 3.âExigent circumstances that involve an immediate danger 231 or threat to persons or property or the escape of a perpetrator. 232 (d)âA first violation of this subsection is an infraction. 233 A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a 234 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 235 775.082 or s. 775.083. 236 (e)âOn or before October 1, 2026, the Department of Law 237 Enforcement shall adopt rules regulating the use of face 238 coverings to comply with this subsection. 239 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.